Massachusetts, session 194th, H629.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1Q of chapter 69 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended in line 10 by inserting after the word “System” the following words- “or other
assessment or equivalent alternative that the board shall establish”
of 1